Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-144
Certificate of title; issuance; filing; application; contents; form.

(1)(a)(i) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection, the county treasurer shall be responsible for issuing and filing certificates of title for vehicles, and each county shall issue and file such certificates of title using the Vehicle Title and Registration System which shall be provided and maintained by the department. Application for a certificate of title shall be made upon a form prescribed by the department. All applications shall be accompanied by the appropriate fee or fees.

(ii) In addition to the information required under subdivision (1)(a)(i) of this section, the application for a certificate of title shall contain (A)(I) the full legal name as defined in section 60-468.01 of each owner or (II) the name of each owner as such name appears on the owner's motor vehicle operator's license or state identification card and (B)(I) the motor vehicle operator's license number or state identification card number of each owner, if applicable, and one or more of the identification elements as listed in section 60-484 of each owner, if applicable, and (II) if any owner is a business entity, a nonprofit organization, an estate, a trust, or a church-controlled organization, its tax identification number.

(b) The department shall issue and file certificates of title for Nebraska-based fleet vehicles. Application for a certificate of title shall be made upon a form prescribed by the department. All applications shall be accompanied by the appropriate fee or fees.

(c) The department shall issue and file certificates of title for state-owned vehicles. Application for a certificate of title shall be made upon a form prescribed by the department. All applications shall be accompanied by the appropriate fee or fees.

(d) The department shall issue certificates of title pursuant to subsection (2) of section 60-142.01 and section 60-142.06. Application for a certificate of title shall be made upon a form prescribed by the department. All applications shall be accompanied by the appropriate fee or fees.

(e) The department shall issue certificates of title pursuant to section 60-142.09. Application for a certificate of title shall be made upon a form prescribed by the department. All applications shall be accompanied by the appropriate fee or fees.

(2) If the owner of an all-terrain vehicle, a utility-type vehicle, or a minibike resides in Nebraska, the application may be filed with the county treasurer of any county.

(3)(a) If a vehicle has situs in Nebraska, the application for a certificate of title may be filed with the county treasurer of any county.

(b) If a motor vehicle dealer licensed under the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act applies for a certificate of title for a vehicle, the application may be filed with the county treasurer of any county.

(c) An approved licensed dealer participating in the electronic dealer services system pursuant to section 60-1507 may apply for a certificate of title for a vehicle to the county treasurer of any county or the department in a manner provided by the electronic dealer services system.

(4) If the owner of a vehicle is a nonresident, the application shall be filed in the county in which the transaction is consummated.

(5) The application shall be filed within thirty days after the delivery of the vehicle.

(6) All applicants registering a vehicle pursuant to section 60-3,198 shall file the application for a certificate of title with the Division of Motor Carrier Services of the department. The division shall deliver the certificate to the applicant if there are no liens on the vehicle. If there are one or more liens on the vehicle, the certificate of title shall be handled as provided in section 60-164. All certificates of title issued by the division shall be issued in the manner prescribed for the county treasurer in section 60-152.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 44;

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 13;

Laws 2006, LB 765, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB202, § 12;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 11;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB212, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 29;

Laws 2015, LB642, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 13;

Laws 2019, LB270, § 7;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 8;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 8;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 8.

Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, see section 60-1401.

There is no legal requirement that a lien be noted on a certificate of title purportedly covering property not subject to the Certificate of Title Act, even though a certificate of title for such property has been issued. Cushman Sales & Service of Nebraska, Inc. v. Muirhead, 201 Neb. 495, 268 N.W.2d 440 (1978).

Under the Nebraska Certificate of Title Act, a certificate of title is the exclusive method provided by statute for the transfer of title to an automobile, but it is not conclusive of ownership. First Nat. Bank & Trust Co. v. Ohio Cas. Ins. Co., 196 Neb. 595, 244 N.W.2d 209 (1976).

In the absence of even an assignment of certificate of title, title to motor vehicle remained in person named in certificate of title. Turpin v. Standard Reliance Ins. Co., 169 Neb. 233, 99 N.W.2d 26 (1959).

If applicant is a nonresident, application for certificate must be filed in county in which transaction is consummated. Universal C.I.T. Credit Corp. v. Vogt, 165 Neb. 611, 86 N.W.2d 771 (1957).

Legislature contemplated that form provided must be fully and properly executed. Loyal's Auto Exchange, Inc. v. Munch, 153 Neb. 628, 45 N.W.2d 913 (1951).